Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.200

Signage concerning assaults in court facilities during court proceedings.

(1) Signage shall be posted notifying the public of the possible enhanced penalties under chapter 256, Laws of 2013.

(2) The signage shall be prominently displayed at any public entrance to a courtroom.

(3) The administrative office of the courts shall develop a standard signage form notifying the public of the possible enhanced penalties under chapter 256, Laws of 2013.

[ 2013 c 256 s 3.]